Louisiana, session 2026, HB771.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1113 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1113. Coordination of benefits; Medicare-eligible retirees; return to employment
A. The provisions of this Section apply to any individual who meets all of
the following criteria:
(1) Is eligible for benefits under the federal Medicare program.
(2) Previously retired from employment.
(3) Subsequently returns to active employment and becomes covered by any
health insurance coverage provided through a policy or certificate of insurance
subject to regulation pursuant to state law, a health maintenance organization, an
employer-sponsored health plan, the office of group benefits, or an equivalent
federal or state health plan.
B.(1) For purposes of this Section, a health insurance issuer that provides
coverage described in Paragraph (A)(3) of this Section shall coordinate Medicare as
the primary payer for any individual described in Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-42 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 771
and shall coordinate any health insurance coverage subject to the provisions of this
Section as secondary to Medicare.
(2) A health insurance issuer shall not designate Medicare as a secondary
payer, except where federal law expressly requires otherwise.
C. This Section does not require any action that would conflict with or be
preempted by 42 CFR §411.32 or other applicable federal regulations.